Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-6,249
Pneumatic tires; when required.

The wheels of all vehicles, including trailers, except vehicles operated at twenty miles per hour or less, shall be equipped with pneumatic tires.

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 345.